Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1287YH (3) 91 ll/js H.F. 2 Section 1. Section 331.801, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. To serve as a county medical examiner , a person shall be 3 licensed in this state as a doctor of medicine and surgery, a 4 doctor of osteopathic medicine and surgery, or an osteopathic 5 physician , an advanced registered nurse practitioner, or a 6 physician assistant . The medical examiner shall be appointed 7 by the board from lists of two or more names submitted by the 8 medical society and , any of its allied medical societies, or 9 the osteopathic society of the county in which the candidate 10 resides. If names are not submitted by either society any of 11 these societies , the board may appoint any licensed physician, 12 osteopathic physician and surgeon, or osteopathic physician , 13 advanced registered nurse practitioner, or physician assistant 14 of the county. If a qualified physician , advanced registered 15 nurse practitioner, or physician assistant of the county 16 will not serve, the board may appoint a physician , advanced 17 registered nurse practitioner, or physician assistant from 18 another county. If a county medical examiner is unable to 19 serve in a particular case or for a period of time, the medical 20 examiner shall promptly notify the chairperson of the board 21 who shall designate some other qualified physician , advanced 22 registered nurse practitioner, or physician assistant to serve 23 temporarily. 24